Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-103
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Uniform Credentialing Act are (1) to protect the public health, safety, and welfare by (a) providing for the credentialing of persons and businesses that provide health and health-related services and environmental services which are made subject to the act and (b) the development, establishment, and enforcement of standards for such services and (2) to provide for the efficient, adequate, and safe practice of such persons and businesses.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 3.